Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.272

Family assessment—Assessment for child safety and well-being—Referral to preschool, child care, or early learning programs—Communicating with and assisting families.

(1) The family assessment response worker must assess for child safety and child well-being when collaborating with a family to determine the need for child care, preschool, or home visiting services and, as appropriate, the family assessment response worker must refer children to preschool programs that are enrolled in the early achievers program and rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 unless:

(a) The family lives in an area with no local preschool programs that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 in the early achievers program;

(b) The local preschool programs that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 in the early achievers program are not able to meet the needs of the child; or

(c) The child is attending a preschool program prior to participating in family assessment response and the parent or caregiver does not want the child to change preschool programs.

(2) The family assessment response worker may make child care referrals for nonschool-aged children to licensed child care programs that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 in the early achievers program described in *RCW 43.215.100 unless:

(a) The family lives in an area with no local programs that rate at level 3, 4, or 5 in the early achievers program;

(b) The local child care programs that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 in the early achievers program are not able to meet the needs of the child; or

(c) The child is attending a child care program prior to participating in family assessment response and the parent or caregiver does not want the child to change child care programs.

(3) The family assessment response worker shall, when appropriate, provide referrals to high quality child care and early learning programs.

(4) The family assessment response worker shall, when appropriate, provide referrals to state and federally subsidized programs such as, but not limited to, licensed child care programs that receive state subsidy pursuant to *RCW 43.215.135; early childhood education and assistance programs; head start programs; and early head start programs.

(5) Prior to closing the family assessment response case, the family assessment response worker must, when appropriate, discuss child care and early learning services with the child's parent or caregiver.

If the family plans to use child care or early learning services, the family assessment response worker must work with the family to facilitate enrollment.

[ 2014 c 160 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.215.100 and 43.215.135 were recodified as RCW 43.216.085 and 43.216.135, respectively, pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.